Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28B.10.281 and 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:((Any))A student who organizes ((and/))or participates, or both, in any demonstration((, riot or other activity of which the effect is to))that interferes with or disrupts the normal educational process at ((such))the institution ((shall not be eligible for such aid))of higher education in which the student is enrolled is not eligible for aid if:(1) The institution of higher education determines by formal finding that, in connection with the demonstration and in violation of the institution's code of conduct, the student engaged in or advocated for others to engage in:(a) Discriminatory conduct;(b) Harassing conduct; or(c) Other conduct intended to cause harm to persons; or(2) The student is convicted of a felony conviction in connection with the demonstration for a crime involving:(a) Physical harm;(b) Threats of physical harm; or(c) Destruction of property.--- END ---